North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108C. Medicaid and Health Choice Provider Requirements.
§ 108C-1. Scope; applicability of this Chapter.

This Chapter applies to providers enrolled in Medicaid or Health Choice.

(2011-399, s. 1.)

Cross References.

- As to authorization of Medical Assistance Program, see

G.S. 108A-54

. As to procedures for changing medical policy, see

G.S. 108A-54

.2.

Electronic Transaction Requirements for Providers.

- Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12H.8, as amended by Session Laws 2013-363, s. 4.9(b), provides: "(a) Providers shall follow the Department's established procedures for securing electronic payments, and the Department shall not provide routine provider payments by check. Medicaid providers shall file claims electronically, except that nonelectronic claims submission may be required when it is in the best interest of the Department.

"(b) Providers shall submit Preadmission Screening and Annual Resident Reviews (PASARR) through the Department's Web-based tool or through a vendor with interface capability to submit data into the Web-based PASARR.

"(c) Providers shall submit requests for prior authorizations electronically via Web site. Providers shall access their authorizations via online portals rather than receiving hard copies by mail. Providers shall receive copies of adverse decisions electronically, although recipients shall receive adverse decisions via certified mail.

"(d) Providers shall submit their provider enrollment applications online. The Department shall accept electronic signatures rather than require receipt of signed hard copies."

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2015-241, s. 12H.4, as amended by Session Laws 2015-264, s. 87.5, provides: "The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall charge an application fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00), and the amount federally required, to each provider enrolling in the Medicaid Program for the first time. The fee shall be charged to all providers at recredentialing every five years."

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12H.7.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as 'The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.'"

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.4, provides: "Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium."

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

§ 108C-2. Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

Adverse determination. - A final decision by the Department to deny, terminate, suspend, reduce, or recoup a Medicaid payment or to deny, terminate, or suspend a provider's or applicant's participation in the Medical Assistance Program.

Applicant. - An individual, partnership, group, association, corporation, institution, or entity that applies to the Department for enrollment as a provider in the North Carolina Medical Assistance Program or the North Carolina Health Insurance Program for Children.

Department. - The North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services, its legally authorized agents, contractors, or vendors who acting within the scope of their authorized activities, assess, authorize, manage, review, audit, monitor, or provide services pursuant to Title XIX or XXI of the Social Security Act, the North Carolina State Plan of Medical Assistance, the North Carolina State Plan of the Health Insurance Program for Children, or any waivers of the federal Medicaid Act granted by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

Division. - The Division of Health Benefits of the Department.

Final overpayment, assessment, or fine. - The amount the provider owes after appeal rights have been exhausted, which shall not include any agency decision that is being contested at the Department or the Office of Administrative Hearings or in Superior Court, provided that the Superior Court has entered a stay pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 150B-48

.

Health Choice. - The Health Insurance Program for Children authorized by

G.S. 108A-70.25

and as set forth in the North Carolina State Plan of the Health Insurance Program for Children.

Managing employee. - As defined in 42 C.F.R. § 455.101.

Medicaid. - The Medical Assistance program authorized by

G.S. 108A-54

and as set forth in the North Carolina State Plan of Medical Assistance.

Owner and/or operator. - As defined in 42 C.F.R. § 455.101.

Provider. - An individual, partnership, group, association, corporation, institution, or entity required to enroll in the North Carolina Medical Assistance Program or the North Carolina Health Insurance Program for Children to provide services, goods, supplies, or merchandise to a Medicaid or Health Choice recipient.

Revalidation. - The reenrollment of a provider in the Medicaid or Health Choice programs as required under federal law.

Secretary. - The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services.

(2011-399, s. 1; 2018-5, s. 11H.12(b); 2019-81, s. 15(a).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2018-5, s. 11H.12(c), made subdivision (12) of this section, as added by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 11H.12(b), effective June 12, 2018, and applicable to initial provider applications and revalidation requests made on or after that day.

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as the 'Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2018.'"

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 39.4, provides: "Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2018-2019 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2018-2019 fiscal year."

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2018-5, s. 11H.12(b), added subdivision (12). For effective date and applicablity, see editor's note.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 15(a), effective July 1, 2019, substituted "Division of Health Benefits" for "Division of Medical Assistance" in subdivision (4).

§ 108C-2.1. Provider application and revalidation fee.

Each provider that submits an application to enroll in the Medicaid program shall submit an application fee. The application fee shall be the sum of the amount federally required and one hundred dollars ($100.00).

The fee required under subsection (a) of this section shall be charged to all providers at revalidation every five years.

(2017-57, s. 11H.3; 2021-62, s. 4.5.)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.7 made this section effective July 1, 2017.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as the 'Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.'"

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as the "2020 COVID-19 Recovery Act."

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 1.2, provides: "Except as otherwise provided, the following definitions apply in this act:

"(1) CDC. - The federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

"(2) Coronavirus or COVID-19. - The coronavirus disease 2019.

"(3) COVID-19 emergency. - The period beginning March 10, 2020, and ending on the date the Governor signs an executive order rescinding Executive Order No. 116 (2020), Declaration of a State of Emergency to Coordinate Response and Protective Actions to Prevent the Spread of COVID-19.

"(4) COVID-19 Recovery Legislation. - The following legislation enacted by Congress:

"a. The Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act, P.L. 116-136.

"b. The Families First Coronavirus Response Act, P.L. 116-127.

"c. The Coronavirus Preparedness and Response Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2020, P.L. 116-123.

"d. Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act, P.L. 116-139."

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 1.3, provides: "The General Assembly finds that State government must serve as a facilitator in assisting local governments, communities, families, workers and other individuals, and businesses in accessing federal relief and recovery funds related to the COVID-19 pandemic. The purpose of this act is to fulfill the General Assembly's constitutional duty to appropriate all funds, including federal funds appropriated or otherwise made available under the COVID-19 Recovery Legislation, and to direct the use of those funds in a manner that is consistent with the authorizing federal legislation and that responsibly provides for the public health and economic well-being of the State."

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 4.7, provides: "In order for the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, to implement the temporary provider enrollment changes under the 1135 waiver approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the North Carolina Medicaid program and NC Health Choice program, the following statutes shall not apply to the North Carolina Medicaid program and the NC Health Choice program from March 1, 2020, through the duration of the declared nationwide public health emergency as a result of the 2019 novel coronavirus:

"(1)

G.S. 108C-2.1

.

"(2) G.S. 108C-4(a).

"(3) G.S. 108C-9(a) with respect to any required trainings prior to enrollment.

"(4) G.S. 108C-9(c)." Session Laws 2021-62, s. 1.2, effective July 29, 2021, repealed Session Laws 2020-4, s. 4.7.

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 5.2, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2021-62, s. 4.5, effective June 29, 2021, substituted "revalidation” for "recredentialing” in the section heading and subsection (b).

§ 108C-3. Medicaid and Health Choice provider screening.

Provider Screening. - The Department shall conduct provider screening of Medicaid and Health Choice providers in accordance with applicable State or federal law or regulation.

Enrollment Screening. - The Department must screen all initial provider applications for enrollment in Medicaid and Health Choice, including applications for a new practice location, and all revalidation requests based on Department assessment of risk and assignment of the provider to a categorical risk level of "limited," "moderate," or "high." If a provider could fit within more than one risk level described in this section, the highest level of screening is applicable.

Limited Categorical Risk Provider Types. - The following provider types are hereby designated as "limited" categorical risk:

Ambulatory surgical centers.

(1a) Behavioral health and intellectual and developmental disability provider agencies that are nationally accredited by an entity approved by the Secretary.

End-stage renal disease facilities.

Federally qualified health centers.

Health programs operated by an Indian Health Program (as defined in section 4(12) of the Indian Health Care Improvement Act) or an urban Indian organization (as defined in section 4(29) of the Indian Health Care Improvement Act) that receives funding from the Indian Health Service pursuant to Title V of the Indian Health Care Improvement Act.

Histocompatibility laboratories.

Hospitals, including critical access hospitals, Department of Veterans Affairs Hospitals, and other State or federally owned hospital facilities.

(6a) Licensed outpatient behavioral health providers.

Local Education Agencies.

Mammography screening centers.

Mass immunization roster billers.

Nursing facilities, including Intermediate Care Facilities for Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities.

Organ procurement organizations.

Physician or nonphysician practitioners (including nurse practitioners, CRNAs, physician assistants, physician extenders, occupational therapists, speech/language pathologists, chiropractors, and audiologists), optometrists, dentists and orthodontists, and medical groups or clinics.

Radiation therapy centers.

Rural health clinics.

Hearing aid dealers.

Portable X-ray suppliers.

Religious nonmedical health care institutions.

Registered dieticians.

Clearinghouses, billing agents, and alternate payees.

Local health departments.

When the Department designates a provider as a "limited" categorical level of risk, the Department shall conduct such screening functions as required by federal law.

Moderate Categorical Risk Provider Types. - The following provider types are hereby designated as "moderate" categorical risk:

Ambulance services.

Comprehensive outpatient rehabilitation facilities.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 11H.12(a), effective June 12, 2018.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-378, s. 6, effective October 1, 2013.

Hospice organizations.

Independent clinical laboratories.

Independent diagnostic testing facilities.

Pharmacy Services.

Physical therapists enrolling as individuals or as group practices.

Revalidating adult care homes delivering Medicaid-reimbursed services.

Revalidating agencies providing durable medical equipment, including, but not limited to, orthotics and prosthetics.

Revalidating agencies providing nonbehavioral health home- or community-based services pursuant to waivers authorized by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under 42 U.S.C. § 1396n(c).

Revalidating agencies providing private duty nursing, home health, personal care services or in-home care services, or home infusion.

Nonemergency medical transportation.

When the Department designates a provider as a "moderate"' categorical level of risk, the Department shall conduct such screening functions as required by federal law and regulation.

High Categorical Risk Provider Types. - The following provider types are hereby designated as "high" categorical risk:

Prospective (newly enrolling) adult care homes delivering Medicaid-reimbursed services.

Agencies providing behavioral health services, excluding (i) behavioral health and intellectual and developmental disability provider agencies that are nationally accredited by an entity approved by the Secretary and (ii) licensed outpatient behavioral health providers.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 11H.12(a), effective June 12, 2018.

Prospective (newly enrolling) agencies providing durable medical equipment, including, but not limited to, orthotics and prosthetics.

Agencies providing HIV case management.

Prospective (newly enrolling) agencies providing nonbehavioral health home- or community-based services pursuant to waivers authorized by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under 42 U.S.C. § 1396n(c).

Prospective (newly enrolling) agencies providing personal care services or in-home care services.

Prospective (newly enrolling) agencies providing private duty nursing, home health, or home infusion.

Providers against whom the Department has imposed a payment suspension based upon a credible allegation of fraud in accordance with 42 C.F.R. § 455.23 within the previous 12-month period. The Department shall return the provider to its original risk category not later than 12 months after the cessation of the payment suspension.

Providers that were excluded, or whose owners, operators, or managing employees were excluded, by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Office of Inspector General, the Medicare program, or another state's Medicaid or Children's Health Insurance Program within the previous 10 years.

Providers who have incurred a Medicaid or Health Choice final overpayment, assessment, or fine to the Department in excess of twenty percent (20%) of the provider's payments received from Medicaid and Health Choice in the previous 12-month period. The Department shall return the provider to its original risk category not later than 12 months after the completion of the provider's repayment of the final overpayment, assessment, or fine.

Providers whose owners, operators, or managing employees were convicted of a disqualifying offense pursuant to

G.S. 108C-4

but were granted an exemption by the Department within the previous 10 years.

When the Department designates a provider as a "high" categorical level of risk, the Department shall conduct such screening functions as required by federal law and regulation.

For providers dually enrolled in the federal Medicare program and Medicaid, the Department may rely on the results of the provider screening performed by Medicare contractors.

For out-of-state providers, the Department may rely on the results of the provider screening performed by the Medicaid agencies or Children's Health Insurance Program agencies of other states.

(2011-399, s. 1; 2013-378, s. 6; 2016-94, s. 12H.3(a); 2018-5, s. 11H.12(a).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2016-94, s. 1.2, provides: "This act shall be known as the 'Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2016.'"

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 11H.12(c), made the amendment of this section by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 11H.12(a), effective June 12, 2018, and applicable to initial provider applications and revalidation requests made on or after that day.

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as the 'Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2018.'"

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 39.4, provides: "Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2018-2019 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2018-2019 fiscal year."

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2013-378, s. 6, effective October 1, 2013, added "dentists and orthodontists" in subdivision (c)(12); added subdivisions (c)(16) through (c)(20) and (e)(14); and deleted subdivision (e)(4).

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 12H.3(a), effective July 14, 2016, in subdivision (g)(10), inserted "the Medicare program" following "U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Office of Inspector General," and substituted "or Children's Health Insurance Program" for "program" near the end; and substituted "Children's Health Insurance Program" for "Health Insurance Program for Children" near the end of subsection (j).

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 11H.12(a), added subdivisions (c)(1a) and (c)(6a); in subdivision (c)(10), substituted "Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities" for "the Mentally Retarded"; deleted subdivision (e)(3), which read: "Critical Access Behavioral Health Agencies."; in subdivision (e)(12), substituted "nonbehavioral health home-" for "home-"; rewrote subdivision (g)(2); deleted subdivision (g)(3), which read: "Directly enrolled outpatient behavioral health services providers."; and, in subdivision (g)(6), substituted "nonbehavioral health home-" for "home". For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 108C-4. Criminal history record checks for certain providers.

The Department shall conduct criminal history records checks of provider applicants and enrolled providers in accordance with federal law and regulation.

The Division shall deny enrollment or terminate the enrollment of a provider where any person with a five percent (5%) or greater direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider has been convicted of a criminal offense related to that person's involvement with the Medicare, Medicaid, or Health Choice program in the last 10 years, unless the Division determines that denial or termination of enrollment is not in the best interests of Medicaid and the State Medicaid agency documents that determination in writing. The Department shall honor civil and criminal settlement agreements entered into with a provider or any person with a five percent (5%) or greater direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider within 10 years of the effective date of this act.

The Division may deny enrollment or terminate the enrollment of a provider subject to

G.S. 108C-3(g)

for any of the following offenses of the provider, an owner and/or operator, or employee if, after review of the seriousness, age, and other circumstances involving the offense, the Division determines it is in the best interest of the integrity of Medicaid or Health Choice to do so: any criminal offenses as set forth in any of the following Articles of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes: Article 5, Counterfeiting and Issuing Monetary Substitutes; Article 5A, Endangering Executive, Legislative, and Court Officers; Article 6, Homicide; Article 7B, Rape and Other Sex Offenses; Article 8, Assaults; Article 10, Kidnapping and Abduction; Article 13, Malicious Injury or Damage by Use of Explosive or Incendiary Device or Material; Article 14, Burglary and Other Housebreakings; Article 15, Arson and Other Burnings; Article 16, Larceny; Article 17, Robbery; Article 18, Embezzlement; Article 19, False Pretenses and Cheats; Article 19A, Obtaining Property or Services by False or Fraudulent Use of Credit Device or Other Means; Article 19B, Financial Transaction Card Crime Act; Article 20, Frauds; Article 21, Forgery; Article 26, Offenses Against Public Morality and Decency; Article 26A, Adult Establishments; Article 27, Prostitution; Article 28, Perjury; Article 29, Bribery; Article 31, Misconduct in Public Office; Article 35, Offenses Against the Public Peace; Article 36A, Riots and Civil Disorders; Article 39, Protection of Minors; Article 40, Protection of the Family; Article 59, Public Intoxication; and Article 60, Computer-Related Crime. The crimes also include possession or sale of drugs in violation of the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, and alcohol-related offenses such as sale to underage persons in violation of

G.S. 18B-302

, or driving while impaired in violation of

G.S. 20-138.1

through

G.S. 20-138.5

.

(2011-399, s. 1; 2015-181, s. 47.)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2020-4, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as the "2020 COVID-19 Recovery Act."

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 1.2, provides: "Except as otherwise provided, the following definitions apply in this act:

"(1) CDC. - The federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

"(2) Coronavirus or COVID-19. - The coronavirus disease 2019.

"(3) COVID-19 emergency. - The period beginning March 10, 2020, and ending on the date the Governor signs an executive order rescinding Executive Order No. 116 (2020), Declaration of a State of Emergency to Coordinate Response and Protective Actions to Prevent the Spread of COVID-19.

"(4) COVID-19 Recovery Legislation. - The following legislation enacted by Congress:

"a. The Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act, P.L. 116-136.

"b. The Families First Coronavirus Response Act, P.L. 116-127.

"c. The Coronavirus Preparedness and Response Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2020, P.L. 116-123.

"d. Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act, P.L. 116-139."

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 1.3, provides: "The General Assembly finds that State government must serve as a facilitator in assisting local governments, communities, families, workers and other individuals, and businesses in accessing federal relief and recovery funds related to the COVID-19 pandemic. The purpose of this act is to fulfill the General Assembly's constitutional duty to appropriate all funds, including federal funds appropriated or otherwise made available under the COVID-19 Recovery Legislation, and to direct the use of those funds in a manner that is consistent with the authorizing federal legislation and that responsibly provides for the public health and economic well-being of the State."

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 4.7, provides: "In order for the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, to implement the temporary provider enrollment changes under the 1135 waiver approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the North Carolina Medicaid program and NC Health Choice program, the following statutes shall not apply to the North Carolina Medicaid program and the NC Health Choice program from March 1, 2020, through the duration of the declared nationwide public health emergency as a result of the 2019 novel coronavirus:

"(1)

G.S. 108C-2.1

.

"(2) G.S. 108C-4(a).

"(3) G.S. 108C-9(a) with respect to any required trainings prior to enrollment.

"(4) G.S. 108C-9(c)." Session Laws 2021-62, s. 1.2, effective July 29, 2021, repealed Session Laws 2020-4, s. 4.7.

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 5.2, is a severability clause.

§ 108C-5. Payment suspension and audits utilizing extrapolation.

The Department may suspend payments to a provider in accordance with the requirements and procedures set forth in 42 C.F.R. § 455.23.

In addition to the procedures for suspending payment set forth at 42 C.F.R. § 455.23, the Department may also suspend payment to any provider that (i) owes a final overpayment, assessment, or fine to the Department and has not entered into an approved payment plan with the Department or (ii) has had its participation in the Medicaid or Health Choice programs suspended or terminated by the Department. For purposes of this section, a suspension or termination of participation does not become final until all administrative appeal rights have been exhausted and shall not include any agency decision that is being contested at the Department or the Office of Administrative Hearings or in Superior Court provided that the Superior Court has entered a stay pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 150B-48

.

For providers who owe a final overpayment, assessment, or fine to the Department, the payment suspension shall begin the thirty-first day after the overpayment, assessment, or fine becomes final. The payment suspension shall not exceed the amount owed to the Department, including any applicable penalty and interest charges.

Providers whose participation in the Medicaid or Health Choice programs has been suspended or terminated shall have all payments suspended beginning on the thirty-first day after the suspension or termination becomes final.

The Department shall consult with the N.C. Departments of Treasury and Revenue and other State departments and agencies to determine if a provider owes debts or fines to the State. The Department may collect any of these debts owed to the State subsequent to consideration by the Department of the financial impact upon the provider and the impact upon access to the services provided by the provider.

When issuing payment suspensions in accordance with this Chapter, the Department may suspend payment to all providers which share the same IRS Employee Identification Number or corporate parent as the provider or provider site location which owes the final overpayment, assessment, or fine. The Department shall give 30 days advance written notice to all providers which share the same IRS Employee Identification Number or corporate parent as the provider or provider site location of the intention of the Department to implement a payment suspension.

The Department is authorized to approve a payment plan for a provider to pay a final overpayment, assessment, or fine including interest and any penalty. The payment plan can include a term of up to 24 months. The Department shall establish in rule the conditions of such provider payment plans. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the provider and the Department from mutually agreeing to modifications of a payment plan.

All payments suspended in accordance with this Chapter shall be applied toward any final overpayment, assessment, or fine owed to the Department.

Prior to extrapolating the results of any audits, the Department shall demonstrate and inform the provider that (i) the provider failed to substantially comply with the requirements of State or federal law or regulation or (ii) the Department has a credible allegation of fraud concerning the provider. Nothing in the subsection shall be construed to prohibit the Department from identifying the extrapolated overpayment amount in the same notice that meets the requirements of this subsection.

Audits that result in the extrapolation of results must be performed and reviewed by individuals who shall be credentialed by the Department, as applicable, in the matters to be audited, including, but not limited to, coding or specific clinical issues.

The Department, prior to conducting audits that result in the extrapolation of results shall identify to the provider the matters to be reviewed and specifically list the clinical, including, but not limited to, assessment of medical necessity, coding, authorization, or other matters reviewed and the time periods reviewed.

For those matters and time periods identified in subsection (k) of this section, the provider shall not be subject to further audits by the Department, unless the Department receives a credible allegation of fraud concerning the same time period or the federal government initiates action based on allegations of fraud or other illegal activity for the same time period.

The Department may specify in rules the means by which a provider may conduct voluntary self-audits upon matters subject to audit by the Department. The Department has the authority to review the self-audit for compliance with requirements of State or federal law and regulation and may reject any self-audit conducted by a provider found not in compliance. Upon the provider's payment or payment agreement for any final overpayment, assessment, or fine arising from the provider's self-audit, the provider shall not be subject to further audits by the Department of the matters and time periods subject to the provider's self-audit, except where the Department has received a credible allegation of fraud or the federal government initiates action based on allegations of fraud or other illegal activity for the same time period.

The results of audits that result in the extrapolation of results may be challenged by a provider within the limited or moderate risk categories, pursuant to

G.S. 108C-3

.

The provider shall notify the Department within 15 days of receipt of the tentative audit results of the provider's challenge of the Department's results under this subsection. The provider's notification shall select the means of challenging the error rate found by the Department.

The provider may challenge the error rate found by the Department by doing one of the following:

Conducting a one hundred percent (100%) file review of those matters and time periods identified in subsection (k) of this section and providing the results to the Department within 60 days from the date of the receipt of the Department's notice of tentative audit results.

Conducting a second audit upon a sample identified and produced by the Department utilizing the same statistical and sampling methodology to produce a sample twice the size of the original sample to review those matters and time periods identified in subsection (k) of this section. The Department shall provide a new sample to the provider within 30 days from the date of receipt of a provider's request. The provider shall have 60 days from receipt of the new sample to conduct the audit and provide the results to the Department.

The results of an audit conducted by the provider pursuant to this subsection shall be binding upon the provider. The Department has the authority to review the provider's audit for compliance with the requirements of State and federal law and regulation and may reject any audit conducted by a provider pursuant to this subsection found not in compliance.

Nothing in this subsection shall limit a provider from challenging the accuracy of the Department's audit, the statistical methodology of the Department's original sample, or the credentials of the individuals who performed and reviewed the audit.

The Department shall permit limited correction of clerical, typographical, scrivener's, and computer errors by the provider prior to final determination of any audit.

The provider shall have no less than 30 days from the date of the receipt of the Department's notice of tentative audit results to provide additional documentation not provided to the Department during any audit.

Except as required by federal agency, law, or regulation, or instances of credible allegation of fraud, the provider shall be subject to audits which result in the extrapolation of results for a time period of up to 36 months from date of payment of a provider's claim.

At least annually, the Department shall publish notice of the intention to use audits that result in the extrapolation of results upon its Web site. Such notice shall include the services, provider types, audit elements, and the time periods subject to audit.

Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to prevent the Department from conducting unannounced or targeted audits of providers.

Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to prohibit the Department from utilizing a contractor to send notices to providers on behalf of the Department.

(2011-399, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 12H.26(a), (b).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2011-399, s. 6, made this section effective July 25, 2011, and applicable to audits instituted on or after that date and to final overpayments, assessments, or fines due on or after that date.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as 'The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2014.'"

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 38.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2014-100, s. 12H.26(a) and (b), effective July 1, 2014, in subsection (i), inserted "a" in the first sentence and added the second sentence; and added subsection (t).

§ 108C-5.1. Post-payment review and recovery audit contracts.

The Department shall not pay contingent fees pursuant to any contract with an entity conducting Medicaid post-payment reviews or Recovery Audit Contractor (RAC) audits before all appeal rights have been exhausted. Any contingent fee for Medicaid post-payment reviews or RAC audits shall be calculated as a percentage of the amount of the final overpayment, as defined in

G.S. 108C-2(5)

. The State share of the contingent fee paid for Medicaid post-payment reviews or RAC audits shall not exceed the State share of the amount actually recovered by the Department and applied to the final overpayment.

(2013-360, s. 12H.16(b).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2013-360, s. 38.6, made this section effective July 1, 2013. Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12H.16(c), made this section applicable only to contracts entered into or amended on or after July 26, 2013.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as the 'Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2013.'"

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 38.5 is a severability clause.

§ 108C-6. Agents, clearinghouses, and alternate payees; registration required.

The Department is authorized to establish a registry of billing agents, clearinghouses, and/or alternate payees that submit claims on behalf of providers and to charge a fee to recover the costs of maintaining the registry in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(79) and implementing regulations. All billing agents, clearinghouses, or alternate payees shall register with the Department before submitting claims on behalf of providers or within six months of enactment of this Chapter, whichever is later. Any billing agent, clearinghouse, or alternate payee that fails to register with the Department prior to submitting claims on behalf of providers shall be excluded from the registry for a period not to exceed one year.

(2011-399, s. 1.)